Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-405
Divorces; how obtained.

Such Indians and their descendants may obtain divorces in the manner and for the causes provided in the statutes of this state, and not otherwise.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 5, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 1611;

C.S.1922, § 1560;

C.S.1929, § 42-405;

R.S.1943, § 42-405.